test/src/morphology/V-basudja_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - басудя: # Verb II. '/(eng) to hunt/(rus) охотиться' - 
# Nganasan verbs (imperfective, present tense)
# NgDic 2001; typed up FS
# Verb stems ending in -у/-ү
# (2001: 380)

     басудя+V+Ind+Ipf+ScSg1: басутум
     басудя+V+Ind+Ipf+ScSg2: басутуӊ
     басудя+V+Ind+Ipf+ScSg3: басуту
     басудя+V+Ind+Ipf+ScDu1: басутуми
     басудя+V+Ind+Ipf+ScDu2: басутури
     басудя+V+Ind+Ipf+ScDu3: басутугәй
     басудя+V+Ind+Ipf+ScPl1: басутумуˮ
     басудя+V+Ind+Ipf+ScPl2: басутуруˮ
     басудя+V+Ind+Ipf+ScPl3: басутуˮ
